Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 9. APPLICABILITY OF LAW TO COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS

CHAPTER 273. LAW OR FORUM APPLICABLE TO CERTAIN CONTRACTS FOR DISPOSITION OF GOODS

Sec. 273.001. CONTRACTS SUBJECT TO CHAPTER. This chapter applies to a contract only if:

(1) the contract is for the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition for value of goods for the price, rental, or other consideration of $50,000 or less;

(2) any element of the contract's execution occurred in this state;

(3) a party to the contract is:

(A) an individual resident of this state; or

(B) an association or corporation that is created under the laws of this state or has its principal place of business in this state; and

(4) Section 1.301 does not apply to the contract.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 273.002. NOTICE OF APPLICABLE LAW OR FORUM. If a contract contains a provision making the contract or any conflict arising under the contract subject to another state's laws, litigation in the courts of another state, or arbitration in another state, that provision must be set out conspicuously in print, type, or other form of writing that is boldfaced, capitalized, underlined, or otherwise set out in such a manner that a reasonable person against whom the provision may operate would notice the provision.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.

Sec. 273.003. FAILURE TO PROVIDE NOTICE. A contract provision that does not comply with Section 273.002 is voidable by a party against whom the provision is sought to be enforced.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 885 (H.B. 2278), Sec. 2.01, eff. April 1, 2009.